Massachusetts, session 194th, H4384.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
To amend the Town Charter, Section C-4-1 TOWN ADMINISTRATOR, to change the
title to “TOWN MANAGER” and to make any necessary revisions wherever it appears in the
Charter.
Or take any other action relative thereon or in relation thereto.
of 1